Utah statutes.
53A-1-1108.   Calculation of additional points earned for high school graduation and college and career readiness.

(1)  In addition to the points described in Sections 53A-1-1106 and 53A-1-1107 and subject to Subsection (2), a high school shall receive points, as determined by the State Board of Education, for:

(a)  the percentage of students who graduate from high school; and

(b)  except for the 2012-13 school year, the percentage of students who are considered college ready as measured by a college admissions test administered pursuant to Section 53A-1-611.

(2)  In calculating the percentage of students who graduate, the State Board of Education shall use the same graduation rate for a high school that is used under the federal No Child Left Behind accountability system.

(3) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a school may earn a maximum of 300 points for the criteria described in Subsection (1) with one-half of the maximum number of points allotted to high school graduation and one-half allotted to the percentage of students who are considered college ready as measured by a college admissions test administered pursuant to Section 53A-1-611.

(b)  For the 2012-13 school year, a school may earn a maximum of 150 points for the percentage of students who graduate from high school.



Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session

